Arkansas, session 2025, HB1842.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 12-26-103, as amended by Acts 2025, No.
172, is amended to read as follows:
12-26-103. Office of Criminal Detention Facilities Review Coordinator
— Creation — Duties.
(a) There is established the Office of Criminal Detention Facilities
Review Coordinator within the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement
Standards and Training of the Department of Public Safety which shall consist
of:
(1) A Criminal Detention Facilities Review Coordinator, who
shall be hired and employed by and serve at the pleasure of the Secretary of
the Department of Public Safety;
*CRH224*
03/18/2025 9:46:50 AM CRH224

HB1842
(2) An administrative assistant; and
(3) Other staff permanently or temporarily assigned from within
the Department of Public Safety.
(b) The office shall be responsible for promulgating, upon approval of
the secretary, minimum standards for the construction, maintenance, and
operation of local, county, regional, or state criminal detention facilities
and juvenile detention facilities in accordance with the Arkansas
Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.
(c) The coordinator shall perform all duties assigned by the secretary
Director of the Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training to assure
uniformity in the interpretation and administration of the minimum standards
by the several criminal facility detention review committees.
























03/18/2025 9:46:50 AM CRH224